District of Columbia statutes.
1-1309

Typewritten records authorized.

After May 18, 1910, the recording of all instruments filed for record in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia may be done with book typewriters.

May 18, 1910, 36 Stat. 382, ch. 248

History

1981 Ed., § 1-909.
1973 Ed., § 1-609.

Prior Codifications